Massachusetts, session 194th, H1767.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 218 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by inserting after section 25 the following section:- 
Section 25A. Any party who obtains a judgment for money damages under the procedure 
shall, within 60 days after full satisfaction of such judgment, file a notice of satisfaction of 
judgment with the court that issued the judgment. Any party who fails to do so may be liable to 
the judgment debtor for any costs and attorneys’ fees awarded on motion in the court's discretion 
that were reasonably incurred in proving that the judgment was satisfied in full. This section 
shall not apply to a judgment that has been satisfied by levy of execution. 

of 2 9  SECTION 2. Chapter 235 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
inserting after section 13 the following section:- 
Section 13A. Any party who obtains a judgment for money damages shall, within 60 days 
after full satisfaction of such judgment, file a notice of satisfaction of judgment with the court 
that issued the judgment. Any party who fails to do so may be liable to the judgment debtor for 
any costs and attorneys’ fees awarded on motion in the court's discretion that were reasonably 
incurred in proving that the judgment was satisfied in full. This section shall not apply to a 
judgment that has been satisfied by levy of execution. 
SECTION 3. Chapter 239 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
inserting after section 3 the following section:- 
Section 3A. Any party who obtains a judgment under this chapter that includes money 
damages for rent shall, within 60 days after full satisfaction of such judgment, file a notice of 
satisfaction of judgment with the court that issued the judgment. Any party who fails to do so 
may be liable to the judgment debtor for any costs and attorneys’ fees awarded on motion in the 
court's discretion that were reasonably incurred in proving that the judgment was satisfied in full. 
This section shall not apply to a money judgment that has been satisfied by levy of execution.